Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 43 Cabinet-Level Departments of the Executive Branch
25-43-806. Arkansas Surgeon General.

Be a graduate of a school of medicine recognized by the Arkansas State Medical Board;

Be licensed and in good standing with the board; and

Serve as an advisor to the secretary.

Reviewing, assessing, and developing health policy options, including insurance coverage, health risk management, disease prevention, and health promotion strategies across state agencies;

Providing health policy advice for the secretary and senior state agency officials;

Raising awareness of healthcare and public health areas of priority for advancement of the health of the citizens of Arkansas;

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-807. Patient care providers — Wages — Required withholding — Fringe benefits.

The Department of Health may pay wages and required state withholding, federal withholding, required matching, and other fringe benefits for patient care part-time intermittent contractual personnel who must be employed in order to provide services in the home.

These payments will be made from the appropriation for professional fees and services.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-808. Additional compensation — County health unit administrators.

Any employee serving in the capacity of county health unit administrator shall be eligible for up to ten percent (10%) of additional compensation within the grade during the period of time in which the employee occupies the position.

Employees on the highest level of their grade shall be eligible for additional compensation in an amount not to exceed five and five-tenths percent (5.5%) of their current salary upon assuming responsibility, and this amount shall not be construed as exceeding the line item maximum for the grade for that position.

(1)The Department of Health shall certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the assignment of duties of each employee in this position, the length of the assignment, and the location and reason for the assignment.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall approve the request prior to the awarding of additional compensation.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-809. Office of Health Information Technology — Creation — Purpose — Policy.

The Office of Health Information Technology is created within the Department of Health.

The coordination of health information technology activities throughout Arkansas by the Office of Health Information Technology is necessary to obtain the maximum potential value from the investment of federal and state resources to increase the use of health information technology.

The exchange of health information made possible by the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange can improve the quality of health of Arkansas citizens by reducing the potential for medical errors, reducing the incidence of redundant tests and procedures, improving patient safety, and making the delivery of healthcare services more efficient and affordable.

The office and the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange shall respect and safeguard each person's privacy interests in his or her health and medical information.

The office is authorized to transfer the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange to a nonprofit corporation.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-810. Definitions.

As used in this section and §§25-43-809,25-43-811, and25-43-812:

“Agency” means any agency, board, commission, public instrumentality, political subdivision, or any of the foregoing entities acting on behalf of the State of Arkansas that store, gather, or generate health information;

“Deidentified” means the same as the meaning under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191;

“Health information” means any information, whether oral or recorded in any form or medium, that:

Is created or received by:

A provider of health care;

A health plan;

A public health authority;

An employer;

A health insurer;

A school or university; or

A healthcare clearinghouse; and

Relates to the:

Past, present, or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual;

Provision of health care to an individual; or

Past, present, or future payment for the provision of health care to an individual;

“Health information exchange” means the electronic movement of health-related information among organizations according to nationally recognized standards;

“Health information technology” means the application of information processing involving both computer hardware and software and other technology devices that deal with the storage, retrieval, sharing, and use of healthcare information, data, and knowledge for communication and decision-making;

“Identified” means the same as the meaning under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191;

“Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation in which no part of the income is distributable to its members, directors, or officers as under the Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act of 1993, § 4-33-101 et seq.; and

“State Health Alliance for Records Exchange” means the entity responsible for the processes and procedures that enable the electronic exchange of interoperable health information in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-811. Duties and responsibilities of Office of Health Information Technology.

The Office of Health Information Technology shall coordinate the health information technology initiatives of the state with relevant executive branch agencies, including without limitation state boards, commissions, nonprofit corporations, and institutions of higher education.

The Office of Health Information Technology Coordinator shall be selected and serve in a manner prescribed by the Secretary of the Department of Health.

The office shall:

Assure the effective coordination and collaboration of health information technology planning, development, implementation, and financing;

Review all health information technology-related grant applications before submission to funding entities;

Accept, receive, retain, disburse, and administer any state special or general revenue funds or federal funds specifically appropriated for health information technology;

Make contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient for carrying out its business;

Recommend to the State Board of Health regarding rules necessary to carry out the policies and objectives of this chapter;

Plan, establish, and operate the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange until the time when the operational responsibility and authority for the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange is transferred to a nonprofit corporation; and

Establish reasonable fees or charges for the use of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange to fund the operational costs of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange and the office.

Fees or charges established under subdivision (c)(7)(A) of this section shall be set with the input and guidance of the users of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange, stakeholders, and other interested parties.

Fees or charges established under subdivision (c)(7)(A) of this section shall not exceed the total cost of operating the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange, not including staffing costs for the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange and the office.

Users of data under this chapter shall be charged in a manner that is proportional to their use of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange.

Revenue generated by the fees or charges under subdivision (c)(7)(A) of this section shall be deposited into the Health Information Technology Fund, § 19-5-1244.

The State Health Alliance for Records Exchange shall:

Promoting efficient and effective communication among multiple healthcare providers, including without limitation hospitals, physicians, payers, employers, pharmacies, laboratories, and other healthcare entities;

Creating efficiencies in healthcare costs by eliminating redundancy in data capture and storage and reducing administrative, billing, and data collection costs;

Creating the ability to monitor community health status; and

Providing reliable information to healthcare consumers and purchasers regarding the quality and cost-effectiveness of health care, health plans, and healthcare providers;

Until a nonprofit corporation operates the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange, the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange shall be established and operated by the Office of Health Information Technology with the advice of the Health Information Exchange Council, consisting of the following members appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Health:

The Office of Health Information Technology Coordinator;

A representative of the Department of Finance and Administration;

A representative of the Department of Human Services;

A representative of the Division of Information Systems;

A representative of the health insurance industry;

A representative of the Arkansas Foundation for Medical Care, Inc.;

A representative of the Arkansas Hospital Association, Inc.;

A representative of the Arkansas Medical Society, Inc.;

A representative of the Arkansas Minority Health Commission;

A representative of the Arkansas Nurses Association;

A representative of the Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission;

A representative of the Arkansas Pharmacist's Association;

A representative of the business community;

A representative of the Community Health Centers of Arkansas, Inc.;

A representative of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;

A representative of the Arkansas Health Care Association; and

Two (2) healthcare consumers.

The Chair of the Health Information Exchange Council shall be elected by the members of the council.

(1)The members of the council shall serve three-year terms.

The State Health Alliance for Records Exchange is not a healthcare provider and is not subject to claims under § 16-114-201 et seq.

A person who participates in or subscribes to the services or information provided by the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange shall not be liable in any action for damages or cost of any nature that results solely from the person's use or failure to use the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange information or data that was imputed or retrieved under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, as it existed on January 1, 2011, and regulations adopted under the act, state confidentiality laws and the rules of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange as approved by the Office of Health Information Technology or the governing body of the nonprofit corporation.

A person shall not be subject to antitrust or unfair competition liability based on membership or participation in the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange, which provides an essential governmental function for the public health and safety and enjoys state sovereign immunity.

A person who provides information and data to the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange retains a property right in the information or data but grants to the other participants or subscribers a nonexclusive license to retrieve and use that information or data under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, as it existed on January 1, 2011, and any amendments and regulations adopted under the act, state confidentiality laws, and the rules of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange.

All processes or software developed, designed, or purchased by the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange shall remain the property of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange subject to use by participants or subscribers under the rules of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange.

Patient-specific protected health information shall be disclosed only in accordance with the patient's authorization or in compliance with state confidentiality laws and the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, as it existed on January 1, 2011, and regulations under the act.

Executive branch agencies, including state boards, commissions, nonprofit corporations, and institutions of higher education that implement, acquire, or upgrade health information technology systems shall use health information technology systems and products that meet minimum standards adopted by the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange.

All identified or deidentified health information contained in, stored in, submitted to, transferred by, or released from the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange is not disclosable under applicable state or federal law except to:

A healthcare provider; or

Other authorized person or entity as described by policies and rules promulgated by the State Board of Health or the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange.

Upon the transfer to a nonprofit corporation, the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange shall be governed under the bylaws and incorporation documents of the nonprofit corporation.

The bylaws and incorporation documents of the nonprofit corporation shall further only the objectives and policies set forth in this section and §§ 25-43-809 – 25-43-811.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

25-43-812. State Health Alliance for Records Exchange — Duties.

Serve as the official health information exchange for the State of Arkansas;

Be organized for the purpose of improving the health of Arkansans by:

A member may be re-appointed to serve on the council.

In the event of a vacancy on the council, a person may be appointed to serve the remainder of the term.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
4828.

Subchapter 9

— Department of Human Services

25-43-901. Department of Human Services.

There is created the Department of Human Services as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5121.

25-43-902. State entities transferred to Department of Human Services.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Human Services by a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Arkansas Alcohol and Drug Abuse Coordinating Council, created under § 20-64-1002;

The Arkansas Drug Director, created under § 20-64-1001;

The Arkansas State Council for Interstate Juvenile Supervision, created under § 9-29-401;

The Board of Developmental Disabilities Services, created under § 20-48-203;

The Civilian Student Training Program, created under § 12-61-124;

The Department of Human Services, created under § 25-10-101 [repealed];

The Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services, created under § 20-46-301;

The Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education, created under § 20-78-205;

The Division of Children and Family Services, created under §§ 9-28-102 and 25-10-102;

The Division of County Operations, created under § 25-10-102;

The Division of Developmental Disabilities Services, created under § 25-10-102;

The Division of Medical Services, created under § 25-10-102;

The Division of Provider Services and Quality Assurance, created under § 25-10-102;

The Division of Youth Services, created under §§ 9-28-202 and 25-10-102; and

The Youth Justice Reform Board, created under § 9-28-1201.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Human Services under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Human Services under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Human Services under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Human Services in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 155, § 19, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of the Inspector General.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5121.

25-43-903. Secretary of the Department of Human Services.

The executive head of the Department of Human Services shall be the Secretary of the Department of Human Services.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5121.

25-43-904. Civilian Student Training Program.

There is created within the Department of Human Services the Civilian Student Training Program.

Juvenile participants in the Civilian Student Training Program at Camp Joseph T. Robinson receiving services from the department are authorized to receive a monetary stipend, not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) per week to defray personal hygiene and other personal necessities.

Juvenile participants are authorized to receive uniforms and clothing items as determined by the staff to be appropriate for effective participation in outdoor activities.

Transportation to support Civilian Student Training Program activities for juvenile participants and staff may be provided by commercial lease or purchase of motor vehicles not to exceed six (6) vehicles.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5121.

Subchapter 10

— Department of Inspector General

25-43-1001. Department of Inspector General.

There is created the Department of Inspector General as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5257.

25-43-1002. State entities transferred to Department of Inspector General.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Inspector General under a cabinet-level transfer:

The Arkansas Fair Housing Commission, created under § 16-123-303;

The Internal Audit Section, created under § 19-4-105; and

The Office of Medicaid Inspector General, created under § 20-77-2503.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Inspector General under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Inspector General under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Inspector General under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Inspector General in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

The secretary has the authority to direct the department as necessary to conduct and supervise activities to prevent, detect, and investigate fraud and abuse.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 77, § 11, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Labor and Licensing.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5257.

25-43-1003. Secretary of Department of Inspector General.

The executive head of the Department of Inspector General shall be the Secretary of the Department of Inspector General.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5257.

Subchapter 11

— Department of Labor and Licensing

25-43-1101. Department of Labor and Licensing.

There is created the Department of Labor and Licensing as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5265.

25-43-1102. State entities transferred to Department of Labor and Licensing.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing by a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Arkansas Abstracters' Board, created under § 17-11-401;

The Arkansas Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board, created under § 17-14-201;

The Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board, created under § 20-22-606;

The Arkansas Home Inspector Registration Board, created under § 17-52-304;

The Arkansas Manufactured Home Commission, created under § 20-25-105;

The Arkansas Mediation and Conciliation Service, defined under § 11-2-203;

The Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission, created under § 23-112-201;

The Arkansas Real Estate Commission, created under § 17-42-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Architects, Landscape Architects, and Interior Designers, created under § 17-15-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy, created under § 17-12-201;

The Arkansas Towing and Recovery Board, created under § 27-50-1203;

The Auctioneer's Licensing Board, created under § 17-17-201;

The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas, created under § 17-28-201;

The Contractors Licensing Board, created under § 17-25-201;

The Department of Labor, created under § 25-43-1105, now to be known as the “Division of Labor”;

The Elevator Inspection and Permits Elevator Safety Board under § 20-24-105;

The HVACR Licensing Board, created under § 17-33-201;

The Pawnbroker Licensure Commission, created under § 17-56-201;

The Professional Bail Bond Company and Professional Bail Bondsman Licensing Board, created under § 17-19-106;

The State Athletic Commission, created under § 17-22-201;

The State Board of Barber Examiners, created under § 17-20-201;

The State Board of Collection Agencies, created under § 17-24-201;

The State Board of Licensure for Professional Engineers and Professional Surveyors, created under § 17-30-201;

The State Board of Registration for Professional Geologists, created under § 17-32-201; and

The Workers' Compensation Commission, created under § 11-9-201.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Labor and Licensing in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5265.

25-43-1103. Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing.

The executive head of the Department of Labor and Licensing shall be the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5265.

25-43-1104. Organization.

The Department of Labor and Licensing shall consist of those divisions of the Department of Labor which existed as of June 30, 2019, those state entities transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing pursuant to §25-43-1102, and any other divisions or state entities which may be created by law and placed under the Department of Labor and Licensing.

Members of a statutory board or commission transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing pursuant to a cabinet-level department transfer shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to that board or commission as such statutes may from time to time be amended.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5265.

25-43-1105. Division of Labor.

There is created a Division of Labor within the Department of Labor and Licensing.

The Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing may delegate any duties and responsibilities to the division.

The division shall retain the statutory duties delegated to the division.

The secretary may employ a Director of the Division of Labor.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5265.

25-43-1106. Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions.

There is created a Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions within the Department of Labor and Licensing.

The Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing may delegate any duties and responsibilities to the division.

The secretary may employ a Director of the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5265.

Subchapter 12

— Department of the Military

25-43-1201. Department of the Military — Creation.

There is created the Department of the Military as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5528.